ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 自家醸造用品 > ワイン醸造: 果実酒作り用品; 赤ワイン作り用品; ロゼワイン作り用品; 白ワイン作り用品
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör för hembryggeri och vintillverkning > Vintillverkning: Tillbehör för att göra fruktvin; Tillbehör för tillverkning av rött vin; Tillbehör för tillverkning av rosévin; Tillbehör för tillverkning av vitt vin
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Đồ dùng nấu rượu cho gia đình > Làm rượu: Dụng cụ nấu rượu trái cây; Dụng cụ nấu rượu vang đỏ; Dụng cụ nấu rượu vang hồng; Dụng cụ nấu rượu vang trắng
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Produse pentru prepararea berii și a vinului > Vinificație: Produse pentru prepararea vinului din fructe; Produse pentru prepararea vinului roșu; Produse pentru prepararea vinului rosé; Produse pentru prepararea vinului alb
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Консумативи за домашно пивоварство и винопроизводство > Приготвяне на вино: Консумативи за производство на плодово вино; Консумативи за приготвяне на червено вино; Консумативи за производство на розе; Консумативи за производство на бяло вино
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Oprema za proizvodnju domaćeg piva i vina > Proizvodnja vina: Pribor za proizvodnju voćnog vina; Pribor za proizvodnju crnog vina; Pribor za proizvodnju rosé vina; Pribor za proizvodnju bijelog vina
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Homebrewing & Winemaking Supplies > Wine Making: Fruit Wine Making Supplies; Red Wine Making Supplies; Rosé Wine Making Supplies; White Wine Making Supplies
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Fournitures pour fabrication artisanale de bière et de vin > Fabrication du vin: Fournitures pour la fabrication de vins de fruits; Fournitures pour la fabrication de vin rouge; Fournitures pour la fabrication de vin rosé; Fournitures pour la fabrication de vin blanc
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 酿酒设备/材料 > 酿酒: 果酒酿造用品; 红酒酿造用品; 桃红葡萄酒酿造用品; 白葡萄酒酿造用品
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Suprimentos para fabricação caseira de cerveja e vinho > Fabricação de vinho: Suprimentos para fabricação de vinho de frutas; Suprimentos para fabricação de vinho tinto; Suprimentos para fabricação de vinho rosé; Suprimentos para fabricação de vinho branco
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Produzione casalinga di birra e vino > Produzione di vino: Forniture per la produzione di vino di frutta; Forniture per la produzione di vino rosso; Forniture per la produzione di vino rosé; Forniture per la produzione di vino bianco
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Artigos para fabrico em casa de vinho e cerveja > Fabrico de vinho: Produtos para fazer vinho de frutas; Produtos para fazer vinho tinto; Produtos para fazer vinho rosé; Produtos para fazer vinho branco
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Hjemmebrygning > Vinbrygning: Forsyninger til fremstilling af frugtvin; Forsyninger til fremstilling af rødvin; Forsyninger til fremstilling af rosévin; Forsyninger til fremstilling af hvidvin
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Bier- & Weinherstellung > Weinherstellung: Zubehör für die Herstellung von Fruchtwein; Zubehör für die Herstellung von Rotwein; Zubehör für die Herstellung von Rose; Zubehör für die Herstellung von Weißwein
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Pripomočki za domače pivovarstvo in vinarstvo > Izdelava vina: Pripomočki za pridelavo sadnega vina; Pripomočki za pridelavo rdečega vina; Pripomočki za pridelavo rose vina; Pripomočki za pridelavo belega vina
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Potreby na domácu výrobu piva a vína > Výroba vína: Potreby na výrobu ovocného vína; Potreby na výrobu červeného vína; Potreby na výrobu ružového vína; Potreby na výrobu bieleho vína
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Benodigdheden voor thuis bierbrouwen en wijnmaken > Wijn maken: Benodigdheden voor het maken van fruitwijn; Benodigdheden voor het maken van rode wijn; Benodigdheden voor het maken van roséwijn; Benodigdheden voor het maken van witte wijn
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Utstyr for hjemmebrygging og vinmaking > Vinmaking: Tilbehør til å lage fruktvin; Tilbehør til å lage rødvin; Tilbehør til å lage rosévin; Tilbehør til å lage hvitvin
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Oluen ja viinin valmistustarvikkeet > Viinin valmistus: Hedelmäviinin valmistustarvikkeet; Punaviinin valmistustarvikkeet; Roseeviinin valmistustarvikkeet; Valkoviinin valmistustarvikkeet
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Προμήθειες οικιακής ζυθοποιίας & οινοποίησης > Οινοποίηση: Προμήθειες φρουτώδους οινοποίησης; Προμήθειες ερυθρούς οινοποίησης; Προμήθειες ροζέ οινοποίησης; Προμήθειες λευκής οινοποίησης
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 홈브루잉/와인 제조 용품 > 와인 제조: 과일주 제조 용품; 레드 와인 제조 용품; 로제 와인 제조 용품; 화이트 와인 제조 용품
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Potřeby pro domácí výrobu piva nebo vína > Výroba vína: Příslušenství pro výrobu ovocných vín; Příslušenství pro výrobu červeného vína; Příslušenství pro výrobu vína rosé; Příslušenství pro výrobu bílého vína
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Warzenie piwa i pędzenie wina > Produkcja wina: Akcesoria do produkcji wina owocowego; Akcesoria do produkcji wina czerwonego; Akcesoria do produkcji wina różowego; Akcesoria do produkcji wina białego
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Товары для домашнего пивоварения и виноделия > Виноделие: Товары для изготовления фруктового вина; Товары для изготовления красного вина; Товары для изготовления розового вина; Товары для изготовления белого вина
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Alaus ir vyno gaminimo namuose reikmenys > Vyno gamyba: Vaisių vyno gaminimo reikmenys; Raudonojo vyno gaminimo reikmenys; Rožinio vyno gaminimo reikmenys; Baltojo vyno gaminimo reikmenys
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Házi sörfőzési és borkészítési kellékek > Borkészítés: Gyümölcsborkészítési kellékek; Vörösborkészítési kellékek; Roséborkészítési kellékek; Fehérborkészítési kellékek
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Evde Bira ve Şarap Yapım Malzemeleri > Şarap Yapımı: Meyve Şarabı Yapımı Malzemeleri; Kırmızı Şarap Yapımı Malzemeleri; Rosé Şarap Yapımı Malzemeleri; Beyaz Şarap Yapımı Malzemeleri
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 釀酒用品 > 釀酒機: 水果酒製作用品; 紅酒製作用品; 粉紅酒製作用品; 白酒製作用品
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Productos para elaborar cerveza y vino en casa > Producción de vino: Suministros para la producción de vino de frutas; Suministros para la producción de vino tinto; Suministros para la producción de vino rosado; Suministros para la producción de vino blanco
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > อุปกรณ์ต้มหรือกลั่นเหล้าและเครื่องทำไวน์ > การทำไวน์: อุปกรณ์ทำไวน์ผลไม้; อุปกรณ์ทำไวน์แดง; อุปกรณ์ทำไวน์โรเซ่; อุปกรณ์ทำไวน์ขาว